Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1416
Bonds; secured by trust agreement; covenants authorized.

In the discretion of the board of directors of the joint authority, any bonds issued under the Joint Public Power Authority Act may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the joint authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. The trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain covenants including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The pledge of all or any part of the revenue derived or to be derived from the project or projects to be financed by the bonds or from the electric system or facilities, hydrogen production, storage, or distribution facilities, or ethanol production or distribution facilities of a joint authority;

(2) The rents, rates, fees, and charges to be established, maintained, and collected and the use and disposal of revenue, gifts, grants, and funds received or to be received by the joint authority;

(3) The setting aside of reserves and the investment, regulation, and disposition of such reserves;

(4) The custody, collection, securing, investment, and payment of any money held for the payment of bonds;

(5) Limitations or restrictions on the purposes to which the proceeds of sale of bonds to be issued may be applied;

(6) Limitations or restrictions on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, or the refunding of outstanding or other bonds;

(7) The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended, the percentage of bonds the holders of which must consent to, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

(8) Events of default and the rights and liabilities arising from such default, the terms and conditions upon which bonds issued under the Joint Public Power Authority Act shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

(9) The preparation and maintenance of a budget;

(10) The retention or employment of consulting engineers, independent auditors, and other technical consultants;

(11) Limitations on or the prohibition of free service to any person, firm, or corporation, public or private;

(12) The acquisition and disposal of property, except that no project or part of such project shall be mortgaged by such trust agreement or resolution, except that the same may be mortgaged in the same manner as provided for a public power district by section 70-644;

(13) Provisions for insurance and for accounting reports and the inspection and audit of such reports; and

(14) The continuing operation and maintenance of the project.

Laws 1982, LB 852, § 16;

Laws 1986, LB 1230, § 56;

Laws 2005, LB 139, § 24.